Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.430

Replacement copies of brand inspection documents—Rules—Fees.

The director may:

(1) Adopt rules governing issuance of replacement copies of brand inspection documents; and

(2) Charge a fee of twenty-five dollars for such copies, which may be increased by rule.

[ 2010 c 66 s 13.]